Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB260.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 157 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary:
(1) (a) If funds are appropriated by the General Assembly for this purpose, a local
board of education shall provide an annual salary supplement to all school
social workers:
1. Who are employed as a certified employee by the local board of
education to provide or coordinate counseling or social work services
for students in a public school setting; and
2. Who hold an active national certification as a school social worker
from the School Social Work Association of America.
(b) The salary supplement shall be in the same amount as the salary
supplement provided to a public school teacher who has attained
certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards
as provided in KRS 157.395. If the amount appropriated by the General
Assembly is less than the amount necessary to meet the requirements of this
paragraph, the salary supplement received by each qualified school social
worker shall be reduced proportionately by the Department of Education so
that all eligible individuals receive the same amount as a supplement.
(c) The supplement shall remain available to a school social worker so long as
funds are appropriated for this purpose by the General Assembly and the
school social worker continues to meet the requirements established by this
subsection. The supplement shall cease if the school social worker is
employed in another capacity by the local board where the provision of
school social work services is incidental to his or her other duties.
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 12/5/2025 10:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 152
(d) The Department of Education shall:
1. Determine how many school social workers qualify for the supplement
each year;
2. Determine the amount of the supplement available each year for each
qualified school social worker based on appropriated funds available;
3. Notify each local board of education of the supplement amount
available to each qualifying school social worker employed by the
local board of education; and
4. Develop a process for payment to local boards of education of
supplement amounts due;
(2) If funds are not appropriated by the General Assembly to support the salary
supplement established by subsection (1) of this section, a local board of
education may provide an annual salary supplement under the conditions
established by subsection (1) of this section using the resources available to the
local board of education; and
(3) The supplement authorized by this section shall be considered in the calculation
for contributions to the Teachers' Retirement System.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 157 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary:
(1) (a) If funds are appropriated by the General Assembly for this purpose, a local
board of education shall provide an annual salary supplement to all school
psychologists:
1. Who are employed as a certified employee by the local board of
education to provide or coordinate school psychologist services for
students in a public school setting; and
2. Who hold an active nationally certified school psychologist credential
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 12/5/2025 10:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 152
from the National Association of School Psychologists.
(b) The salary supplement shall be in the same amount as the salary
supplement provided to a public school teacher who has attained
certification from the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards
as provided in KRS 157.395. If the amount appropriated by the General
Assembly is less than the amount necessary to meet the requirements of this
paragraph, the salary supplement received by each qualified school
psychologist shall be reduced proportionately by the Department of
Education so that all eligible individuals receive the same amount as a
supplement.
(c) The supplement shall remain available to a school psychologist so long as
funds are appropriated for this purpose by the General Assembly and the
school psychologist continues to meet the requirements established by this
subsection. The supplement shall cease if the school psychologist is
employed in another capacity by the local board where the provision of
school psychologist services is incidental to his or her other duties.
(d) The Department of Education shall:
1. Determine how many school psychologists qualify for the supplement
each year;
2. Determine the amount of the supplement available each year for each
qualified school psychologist based on appropriated funds available;
3. Notify each local board of education of the supplement amount
available to each qualifying school psychologist employed by the local
board of education; and
4. Develop a process for payment to local boards of education of
supplement amounts due;
(2) If funds are not appropriated by the General Assembly to support the salary
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 12/5/2025 10:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 152
supplement established by subsection (1) of this section, a local board of
education may provide an annual salary supplement under the conditions
established by subsection (1) of this section using the resources available to the
local board of education; and
(3) The supplement authorized by this section shall be considered in the calculation
for contributions to the Teachers' Retirement System.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 12/5/2025 10:16 AM Jacketed